Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
SHORT TITLE, CONSTRUCTION,
GENERAL PROVISIONS

5-1-101. Short title.

Articles 1 to 9 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code", referred to in said articles as the "code".

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-101, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-1-102. Purposes - rules of construction.

This code shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this code are:

To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing retail installment sales, consumer credit, small loans, and usury;

To provide rate ceilings to assure an adequate supply of credit to consumers;

To further consumer understanding of the terms of credit transactions and to foster competition among suppliers of consumer credit so that consumers may obtain credit at reasonable cost;

To protect consumer buyers, lessees, and borrowers against unfair practices by some suppliers of consumer credit, having due regard for the interests of legitimate and scrupulous creditors;

To permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound consumer credit practices;

To conform the regulation of consumer credit transactions to the policies of the federal "Truth in Lending Act" and the federal "Consumer Leasing Act"; and

To make uniform the law, including administrative rules, among the various jurisdictions.

A reference to a requirement imposed by this code includes reference to a related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-102, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definitions and federal statutory cites of the "Truth in Lending Act" and the "Consumer Leasing Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-1-103. Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this code, the "Uniform Commercial Code" and the principles of law and equity, including the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the provisions of this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1179, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-103, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Commercial Code", see title 4.

5-1-104. Construction against implicit repeal.

This code being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it is deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1179, § 1 effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-104, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-1-105. Severability clause.

If any provision of this code or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this code which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code are declared to be severable.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1179, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-105, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-1-106. Waiver - agreement to forego rights - settlement of claims.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, a consumer may not waive or agree to forego rights or benefits under this code.

A claim by a consumer against a creditor for an excess charge, other violation of this code, or civil penalty, or a claim against a consumer for default or breach of a duty imposed by this code, if disputed in good faith, may be settled by agreement.

A claim, whether or not disputed, against a consumer, may be settled for less value than the amount claimed.

A settlement in which the consumer waives or agrees to forego rights or benefits under this code is invalid if the court as a matter of law finds the settlement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made. The competence of the consumer, any deception or coercion practiced upon the consumer, the nature and extent of the legal advice received by the consumer, and the value of the consideration are relevant to the issue of unconscionability.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1179, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-107, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-1-107. Effect of code on powers of organizations.

This code prescribes maximum charges for all creditors extending consumer credit except lessors and those excluded in sections 5-1-202 and 5-2-213 (2)(b) and displaces existing limitations on the powers of those creditors based on maximum charges.

With respect to sellers of goods or services, small loan companies, licensed lenders, consumer and sales finance companies, loan companies, and commercial banks and trust companies, this code displaces existing limitations on their powers based solely on amount or duration of credit.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this code does not displace limitations on powers of credit unions, savings banks, savings and loan associations, or other thrift institutions whether organized for the profit of shareholders or as mutual organizations.

Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this code does not displace:

Limitations on powers of supervised financial organizations, as defined in section 5-1-301 (45), with respect to the amount of a loan to a single borrower, the ratio of a loan to the value of collateral, the duration of a loan secured by an interest in land, or other similar restrictions designed to protect deposits; or

Limitations on powers an organization is authorized to exercise under the laws of this state or the United States.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1180, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1468, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-1-108, as it existed prior to 2000.